Illinois, session 104th, HB2870.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 5changing Section 701 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 5/701)  (from Ch. 120, par. 7-701)7    Sec. 701. Requirement and amount of withholding. 8    (a) In General. Every employer maintaining an office or 9transacting business within this State and required under the 10provisions of the Internal Revenue Code to withhold a tax on: 11        (1) compensation paid in this State (as determined 12    under Section 304(a)(2)(B)) to an individual; or 13        (2) payments described in subsection (b) shall deduct 14    and withhold from such compensation for each payroll 15    period (as defined in Section 3401 of the Internal Revenue 16    Code) an amount equal to the amount by which such 17    individual's compensation exceeds the proportionate part 18    of this withholding exemption (computed as provided in 19    Section 702) attributable to the payroll period for which 20    such compensation is payable multiplied by a percentage 21    equal to the percentage tax rate for individuals provided 22    in subsection (b) of Section 201. 23    (a-5) Withholding from nonresident employees. For taxable   HB2870- 2 -LRB104 12118 HLH 22217 b1years beginning on or after January 1, 2020, for purposes of 2determining compensation paid in this State under paragraph 3(B) of item (2) of subsection (a) of Section 304: 4        (1) If an employer maintains a time and attendance 5    system that tracks where employees perform services on a 6    daily basis, then data from the time and attendance system 7    shall be used. For purposes of this paragraph, time and 8    attendance system means a system: 9            (A) in which the employee is required, on a 10        contemporaneous basis, to record the work location for 11        every day worked outside of the State where the 12        employment duties are primarily performed; and 13            (B) that is designed to allow the employer to 14        allocate the employee's wages for income tax purposes 15        among all states in which the employee performs 16        services. 17        (2) In all other cases, the employer shall obtain a 18    written statement from the employee of the number of days 19    reasonably expected to be spent performing services in 20    this State during the taxable year. Absent the employer's 21    actual knowledge of fraud or gross negligence by the 22    employee in making the determination or collusion between 23    the employer and the employee to evade tax, the 24    certification so made by the employee and maintained in 25    the employer's books and records shall be prima facie 26    evidence and constitute a rebuttable presumption of the   HB2870- 3 -LRB104 12118 HLH 22217 b1    number of days spent performing services in this State. 2    (a-10) If the compensation is paid through a loan out 3company, as defined under Section 10 of the Film Production 4Services Tax Credit Act of 2008, if the compensation is 5considered compensation paid in this State under paragraph (B) 6of item (2) of subsection (a) of Section 304, and if the 7compensation is for in-State services performed for a 8production that is accredited under Section 10 of the Film 9Production Services Tax Credit Act of 2008 and concludes on or 10after July 1, 2025, then the production company or its 11authorized payroll service company shall be considered the 12employer for the purpose of withholding tax on that 13compensation under this Article 7 and shall withhold at the 14tax rate provided in subsection (b) of Section 201 on all 15payments to loan out companies for services performed in 16Illinois by the loan out company's employees. Notwithstanding 17any other provision of law, nonresident employees of loan out 18companies who perform services in Illinois shall be considered 19taxable nonresidents and shall be subject to the tax under 20this Act in the taxable year in which the employee performs 21services in Illinois. 22    (b) Payment to Residents. Any payment (including 23compensation, but not including a payment from which 24withholding is required under Section 710 of this Act) to a 25resident by a payor maintaining an office or transacting 26business within this State (including any agency, officer, or   HB2870- 4 -LRB104 12118 HLH 22217 b1employee of this State or of any political subdivision of this 2State) and on which withholding of tax is required under the 3provisions of the Internal Revenue Code shall be deemed to be 4compensation paid in this State by an employer to an employee 5for the purposes of Article 7 and Section 601(b)(1) to the 6extent such payment is included in the recipient's base income 7and not subjected to withholding by another state. 8Notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary, no amount 9shall be withheld from unemployment insurance benefit payments 10made to an individual pursuant to the Unemployment Insurance 11Act unless the individual has voluntarily elected the 12withholding pursuant to rules promulgated by the Director of 13Employment Security. 14    (c) Special Definitions. Withholding shall be considered 15required under the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code to 16the extent the Internal Revenue Code either requires 17withholding or allows for voluntary withholding the payor and 18recipient have entered into such a voluntary withholding 19agreement. For the purposes of Article 7 and Section 1002(c) 20the term "employer" includes any payor who is required to 21withhold tax pursuant to this Section. 22    (d) Reciprocal Exemption. The Director may enter into an 23agreement with the taxing authorities of any state which 24imposes a tax on or measured by income to provide that 25compensation paid in such state to residents of this State 26shall be exempt from withholding of such tax; in such case, any   HB2870- 5 -LRB104 12118 HLH 22217 b1compensation paid in this State to residents of such state 2shall be exempt from withholding. All reciprocal agreements 3shall be subject to the requirements of Section 2505-575 of 4the Department of Revenue Law (20 ILCS 2505/2505-575). 5    (e) Notwithstanding subsection (a)(2) of this Section, no 6withholding is required on payments for which withholding is 7required under Section 3405 or 3406 of the Internal Revenue 8Code. 9(Source: P.A. 101-585, eff. 8-26-19; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21.) 10    Section 10. The Film Production Services Tax Credit Act of 112008 is amended by changing Sections 10 and 42 as follows: 12    (35 ILCS 16/10)13    Sec. 10. Definitions. As used in this Act: 14    "Accredited production" means: (i) for productions 15commencing before May 1, 2006, a film, video, or television 16production that has been certified by the Department in which 17the aggregate Illinois labor expenditures included in the cost 18of the production, in the period that ends 12 months after the 19time principal filming or taping of the production began, 20exceed $100,000 for productions of 30 minutes or longer, or 21$50,000 for productions of less than 30 minutes; and (ii) for 22productions commencing on or after May 1, 2006, a film, video, 23or television production that has been certified by the 24Department in which the Illinois production spending included   HB2870- 6 -LRB104 12118 HLH 22217 b1in the cost of production in the period that ends 12 months 2after the time principal filming or taping of the production 3began exceeds $100,000 for productions of 30 minutes or longer 4or exceeds $50,000 for productions of less than 30 minutes. 5"Accredited production" does not include a production that:6        (1) is news, current events, or public programming, or 7    a program that includes weather or market reports; 8        (2) is a talk show produced for local or regional 9    markets; 10        (3) (blank); 11        (4) is a sports event or activity; 12        (5) is a gala presentation or awards show; 13        (6) is a finished production that solicits funds; 14        (7) is a production produced by a film production 15    company if records, as required by 18 U.S.C. 2257, are to 16    be maintained by that film production company with respect 17    to any performer portrayed in that single media or 18    multimedia program; or 19        (8) is a production produced primarily for industrial, 20    corporate, or institutional purposes. 21    "Accredited animated production" means an accredited 22production in which movement and characters' performances are 23created using a frame-by-frame technique and a significant 24number of major characters are animated. Motion capture by 25itself is not an animation technique. 26    "Accredited production certificate" means a certificate   HB2870- 7 -LRB104 12118 HLH 22217 b1issued by the Department certifying that the production is an 2accredited production that meets the guidelines of this Act.3    "Applicant" means a taxpayer that is a film production 4company that is operating or has operated an accredited 5production located within the State of Illinois and that (i) 6owns the copyright in the accredited production throughout the 7Illinois production period or (ii) has contracted directly 8with the owner of the copyright in the accredited production 9or a person acting on behalf of the owner to provide services 10for the production, where the owner of the copyright is not an 11eligible production corporation. 12    "Category 1 production" means an accredited production 13that meets the following criteria: 14        (1) at least 75% of all principal filming or taping 15    days of the accredited production that occur at any 16    soundstage facility within or without Illinois occur at a 17    qualified production facility; and 18        (2) at least 20% of the total expenditures for the 19    accredited production are for (i) tangible property that 20    will be used at a qualified production facility or for the 21    use of the qualified production facility; (ii) the 22    performance of services at a qualified production 23    facility; or (iii) any combination of (i) and (ii). 24    "Category 2 production" means an accredited production 25that that is not a Category 1 production. 26    "Credit" means:   HB2870- 8 -LRB104 12118 HLH 22217 b1        (1) for an accredited production that (i) is approved 2    by the Department on or before January 1, 2005, (ii) 3    begins and commencing before May 1, 2006, and (iii) 4    concludes before July 1, 2025, the amount equal to 25% of 5    the Illinois labor expenditure approved by the Department. 6    The applicant is deemed to have paid, on its balance due 7    day for the year, an amount equal to 25% of its qualified 8    Illinois labor expenditure for the tax year. For Illinois 9    labor expenditures generated by the employment of 10    residents of geographic areas of high poverty or high 11    unemployment, as determined by the Department, in an 12    accredited production commencing before May 1, 2006 and 13    approved by the Department after January 1, 2005, the 14    applicant shall receive an enhanced credit of 10% in 15    addition to the 25% credit; and16        (2) for an accredited production that (i) begins 17    commencing on or after May 1, 2006, (ii) begins and before 18    January 1, 2009, and (iii) concludes before July 1, 2025, 19    the amount equal to:20            (i) 20% of the Illinois production spending for 21        the taxable year; plus22            (ii) 15% of the Illinois labor expenditures 23        generated by the employment of residents of geographic 24        areas of high poverty or high unemployment, as 25        determined by the Department; and26        (3) for an accredited production that begins   HB2870- 9 -LRB104 12118 HLH 22217 b1    commencing on or after January 1, 2009 and concludes 2    before July 1, 2025, the amount equal to: 3            (i) 30% of the Illinois production spending for 4        the taxable year; plus 5            (ii) 15% of the Illinois labor expenditures 6        generated by the employment of residents of geographic 7        areas of high poverty or high unemployment, as 8        determined by the Department; . 9        (4) for a Category 1 production that concludes on or 10    after July 1, 2025, the amount equal to: 11            (i) 35% of the Illinois production spending for 12        the use of tangible personal property or the 13        performance of services from vendors in Illinois and 14        for Illinois labor expenditures generated by the 15        employment of Illinois residents; plus 16            (ii) 3% of the Illinois labor expenditures 17        generated by the employment of Illinois residents that 18        perform services as one of the 2 most senior positions 19        in any department of the accredited production or as 20        an actor appearing in a series regular role on an 21        accredited production that is a television series; 22        plus 23            (iii) 15% of the Illinois labor expenditures 24        generated by the employment of residents of geographic 25        areas of high poverty or high unemployment, as 26        determined by the Department; plus   HB2870- 10 -LRB104 12118 HLH 22217 b1            (iv) 30% of the wages paid to nonresidents for 2        services performed on an accredited production, 3        subject to the limitations of paragraphs (5) and (9.3) 4        of the definition of "Illinois labor expenditure"; 5        (5) for a Category 2 production that concludes on or 6    after July 1, 2025, the amount equal to: 7            (i) 35% of the Illinois production spending for 8        Illinois labor expenditures generated by the 9        employment of Illinois residents; plus 10            (ii) 3% of the Illinois labor expenditures 11        generated by the employment of Illinois residents that 12        perform services as one of the 2 most senior positions 13        in any department of the accredited production or as 14        an actor appearing in a series regular role on an 15        accredited production that is a television series; 16        plus 17            (iii) 15% of the Illinois labor expenditures 18        generated by the employment of residents of geographic 19        areas of high poverty or high unemployment, as 20        determined by the Department; plus 21            (iv) 30% of the Illinois production spending for 22        the use of tangible personal property and the 23        performance of services from vendors in Illinois; plus 24            (v) 30% of the wages paid to nonresidents for 25        services performed on an accredited production, 26        subject to the limitations of paragraphs (5) and (9.4)   HB2870- 11 -LRB104 12118 HLH 22217 b1        of the definition of "Illinois labor expenditure"; and 2        (6) notwithstanding any other provision of law, for an 3    accredited production that concludes on or after July 1, 4    2025, if the total expenditures for the production exceed 5    $75,000,000, then the amount of the credit shall not 6    exceed 30% of the total expenditures for the production. 7    "Department" means the Department of Commerce and Economic 8Opportunity.9    "Director" means the Director of Commerce and Economic 10Opportunity.11    "Illinois labor expenditure" means salary or wages paid to 12employees of the applicant for services on the accredited 13production.14    To qualify as an Illinois labor expenditure, the 15expenditure must be: 16        (1) Reasonable in the circumstances. 17        (2) Included in the federal income tax basis of the 18    property. 19        (3) Incurred by the applicant for services on or after 20    January 1, 2004. 21        (4) Incurred for the production stages of the 22    accredited production, from the final script stage to the 23    end of the post-production stage. 24        (5) Limited to the following:25            (A) for productions that begin before May 1, 2006 26        and conclude before July 1, 2025, the first $25,000 of   HB2870- 12 -LRB104 12118 HLH 22217 b1        wages paid or incurred to each employee of the a 2        production; commencing before May 1, 2006 and 3            (B) for productions that (i) begin on or after May 4        1, 2006, (ii) begin before July 1, 2022, and (iii) 5        conclude before July 1, 2025, the first $100,000 of 6        wages paid or incurred to each employee of the a 7        production; commencing on or after May 1, 2006 and 8        prior to July 1, 2022. 9            (C) for productions that begin on or after July 1, 10        2022 and conclude before July 1, 2025, For productions 11        commencing on or after July 1, 2022, limited to the 12        first $500,000 of wages paid or incurred to each 13        eligible nonresident or resident employee of a 14        production company or loan out company that provides 15        in-State services to a production, whether those wages 16        are paid or incurred by the production company, loan 17        out company, or both, subject to withholding payments 18        provided for in Article 7 of the Illinois Income Tax 19        Act; . 20            (D) for Category 1 productions that conclude on or 21        after July 1, 2025, subject to the provisions of 22        paragraph (9.3): (i) 100% of the wages paid to or 23        incurred for each person who is an eligible resident 24        employee of a production company or a loan out company 25        and who provides in-State services to a production; 26        plus (ii) the first $500,000 of wages paid to or   HB2870- 13 -LRB104 12118 HLH 22217 b1        incurred for each person who is an eligible 2        nonresident employee of a production company and who 3        provides in-State services to a production; plus (iii) 4        100% of the wages paid to or incurred for up to 10 5        people who are eligible nonresident employees of a 6        loan out company and who provide in-State services to 7        a production, including, but not limited to, 8        nonresident actors who are employees of a loan out 9        company, subject to the limitations of paragraph (9.3) 10        for the production with respect to actors; if the 11        total number of eligible nonresident loan out company 12        employees exceeds 10, in the aggregate, for an 13        eligible production, then the additional eligible 14        nonresident loan out company employees who provide 15        in-State services to the production in excess of 10 16        such employees may be considered eligible nonresident 17        employees of the production company, subject to the 18        provisions set forth in item (ii) of this subparagraph 19        (D), so long as, after the inclusion of those 20        additional loan out company employees, the total 21        number of eligible nonresident employees of the 22        accredited production does not exceed the number of 23        eligible nonresident employees allowed for that 24        accredited production under the provisions of 25        paragraph (9.3); and 26            (E) for Category 2 productions that conclude on or   HB2870- 14 -LRB104 12118 HLH 22217 b1        after July 1, 2025, subject to the provisions of 2        paragraph (9.4), the first $500,000 of wages paid to 3        or incurred for each person who is an eligible 4        nonresident employee of a production company or a loan 5        out company or a resident employee of a production 6        company or a loan out company and who provides 7        in-State services to a production. 8        Wages paid to a loan out company employee are 9    considered wages for the purpose of calculating the 10    production's Illinois labor expenditures regardless of 11    whether those wages are paid or incurred by the production 12    company, loan out company, or both, subject to withholding 13    payments provided for in Article 7 of the Illinois Income 14    Tax Act. 15        For purposes of calculating Illinois labor 16    expenditures for a television series, the eligible 17    nonresident wage limitations provided under this 18    subparagraph are applied to the entire season. For the 19    purpose of this paragraph (5), an eligible nonresident is 20    a nonresident whose wages qualify as an Illinois labor 21    expenditure under the provisions of paragraphs paragraph 22    (9) through (9.4) that apply to that production. 23        (6) For a production commencing before May 1, 2006, 24    exclusive of the salary or wages paid to or incurred for 25    the 2 highest paid employees of the production.26        (7) Directly attributable to the accredited   HB2870- 15 -LRB104 12118 HLH 22217 b1    production. 2        (8) (Blank). 3        (9) Prior to July 1, 2022, paid to persons resident in 4    Illinois at the time the payments were made. For a 5    production commencing on or after July 1, 2022, subject to 6    the limitations of paragraphs (9.1) through (9.4), paid to 7    persons resident in Illinois and nonresidents at the time 8    the payments were made. 9        (9.1) For purposes of paragraph (9) this subparagraph, 10    if the production is accredited by the Department before 11    the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 102nd 12    General Assembly, only wages paid to nonresidents working 13    in the following positions shall be considered Illinois 14    labor expenditures: Writer, Director, Director of 15    Photography, Production Designer, Costume Designer, 16    Production Accountant, VFX Supervisor, Editor, Composer, 17    and Actor, subject to the limitations set forth under this 18    subparagraph. For an accredited Illinois production 19    spending of $25,000,000 or less, no more than 2 20    nonresident actors' wages shall qualify as an Illinois 21    labor expenditure. For an accredited production with 22    Illinois production spending of more than $25,000,000, no 23    more than 4 nonresident actor's wages shall qualify as 24    Illinois labor expenditures. 25        (9.2) For purposes of paragraph (9) this subparagraph, 26    if the production is accredited by the Department on or   HB2870- 16 -LRB104 12118 HLH 22217 b1    after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 2    102nd General Assembly and the production concludes before 3    July 1, 2025, wages paid to nonresidents shall qualify as 4    Illinois labor expenditures only under the following 5    conditions:6            (A) the nonresident must be employed in a 7        qualified position;8            (B) for each of those accredited productions, the 9        wages of not more than 9 nonresidents who are employed 10        in a qualified position other than Actor shall qualify 11        as Illinois labor expenditures;12            (C) for an accredited production with Illinois 13        production spending of $25,000,000 or less, no more 14        than 2 nonresident actors' wages shall qualify as 15        Illinois labor expenditures; and 16            (D) for an accredited production with Illinois 17        production spending of more than $25,000,000, no more 18        than 4 nonresident actors' wages shall qualify as 19        Illinois labor expenditures. 20        As used in this paragraph (9.2) (9), "qualified 21    position" means: Writer, Director, Director of 22    Photography, Production Designer, Costume Designer, 23    Production Accountant, VFX Supervisor, Editor, Composer, 24    or Actor. 25        (9.3) For purposes of paragraph (9), in the case of a 26    Category 1 production that concludes on or after July 1,   HB2870- 17 -LRB104 12118 HLH 22217 b1    2025, wages paid to nonresidents shall qualify as Illinois 2    labor expenditures only under the following conditions: 3            (A) the wages of not more than 13 nonresidents who 4        are selected by the accredited production and employed 5        in a position other than Actor shall qualify as 6        Illinois labor expenditures; 7            (B) for an accredited production with Illinois 8        production spending of $20,000,000 or less, no more 9        than 4 nonresident actors' wages shall qualify as 10        Illinois labor expenditures; 11            (C) for an accredited production with Illinois 12        production spending of more than $20,000,000 and less 13        than $40,000,000, no more than 5 nonresident actors' 14        wages shall qualify as Illinois labor expenditures; 15        and16            (D) for an accredited production with Illinois 17        production spending of $40,000,000 or more, no more 18        than 6 nonresident actors' wages shall qualify as 19        Illinois labor expenditures.20        (9.4) For purposes of paragraph (9), in the case of a 21    Category 2 production that concludes on or after July 1, 22    2025, wages paid to nonresidents shall qualify as Illinois 23    labor expenditures only under the following conditions: 24            (A) the wages of not more than 9 nonresidents who 25        are employed in any position other than Actor shall 26        qualify as Illinois labor expenditures; those   HB2870- 18 -LRB104 12118 HLH 22217 b1        nonresidents shall be selected by the accredited 2        production; 3            (B) for an accredited production with Illinois 4        production spending of $25,000,000 or less, no more 5        than 2 nonresident actors' wages shall qualify as 6        Illinois labor expenditures; and 7            (C) for an accredited production with Illinois 8        production spending of more than $25,000,000, no more 9        than 4 nonresident actors' wages shall qualify as 10        Illinois labor expenditures. 11        (10) Paid for services rendered in Illinois. 12    "Illinois production spending" means the expenses incurred 13by the applicant for an accredited production, but does not 14include any monetary prize or the cost of any non-monetary 15prize awarded pursuant to a production in respect of a game, 16questionnaire, or contest. "Illinois production spending" 17includes, without limitation, all of the following:18        (1) expenses to purchase, from vendors within 19    Illinois, tangible personal property that is used in the 20    accredited production;21        (2) expenses to acquire services, from vendors in 22    Illinois, for film production, editing, or processing; and23        (2.1) airfare, if purchased from an airline with a 24    commercial domicile in Illinois; and 25        (3) for a production commencing before July 1, 2022, 26    the compensation, not to exceed $100,000 for any one   HB2870- 19 -LRB104 12118 HLH 22217 b1    employee, for contractual or salaried employees who are 2    Illinois residents performing services with respect to the 3    accredited production. For a production commencing on or 4    after July 1, 2022, the compensation, not to exceed 5    $500,000 for any one employee, for contractual or salaried 6    employees who are Illinois residents or nonresident 7    employees, subject to the limitations set forth under 8    Section 10 of this Act. 9    "Loan out company" means a personal service corporation or 10other entity that is under contract with the taxpayer to 11provide specified individual personnel, such as artists, crew, 12actors, producers, or directors for the performance of 13services used directly in a production. "Loan out company" 14does not include entities contracted with by the taxpayer to 15provide goods or ancillary contractor services such as 16catering, construction, trailers, equipment, or 17transportation. 18    "Qualified production facility" means stage facilities in 19the State in which commercials, television shows, and films 20are or are intended to be regularly produced and that meet the 21other requirements of this definition applicable to the 22accredited production and that contain at least one sound 23stage of at least 15,000 square feet. 24    If the applicant is using the facility for a Category 1 25production, then the facility must meet the following 26requirements:   HB2870- 20 -LRB104 12118 HLH 22217 b1        (1) if construction of the facility was completed 2    before January 1, 2026, then the facility must contain one 3    or more sound stages that, in the aggregate, are at least 4    2,000 square feet; and 5        (2) if construction of the facility was completed on 6    or after January 1, 2026, then the qualified production 7    facility must:8            (A) consist of 4 or more soundstages that have an 9        average square footage of at least 15,000 square feet 10        each and that are column free with a clear height of at 11        least 15 feet under a permanent grid;12            (B) be composed of one or more contiguous 13        buildings; and14            (C) include production support space, such as 15        production offices, a mill, backlot, or 16        post-production facilities. 17    Notwithstanding the provisions of this definition, the 18owner of a facility that qualifies as a qualified production 19facility on the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 20104th General Assembly may expand its existing facilities or 21construct another facility in this State on or after the 22effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 23Assembly, and that new construction shall be considered a 24qualified production facility so long as the additional 25facilities contain one or more sound stages of at least 2,000 26square feet in the aggregate.   HB2870- 21 -LRB104 12118 HLH 22217 b1    For the purposes of this definition of "qualified 2production facility", construction of the facility is 3considered complete when a certificate of occupancy is issued 4for the facility. 5    Rulemaking authority to implement Public Act 95-1006, if 6any, is conditioned on the rules being adopted in accordance 7with all provisions of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 8Act and all rules and procedures of the Joint Committee on 9Administrative Rules; any purported rule not so adopted, for 10whatever reason, is unauthorized. 11    "Total expenditures" means all spending for the accredited 12production that occurs in Illinois, including, but not limited 13to, spending for labor, goods, and services, regardless of 14whether that spending is considered Illinois production 15spending or an Illinois labor expenditure. 16(Source: P.A. 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-700, eff. 4-19-22; 17102-1125, eff. 2-3-23; 103-595, eff. 6-26-24.) 18    (35 ILCS 16/42)19    Sec. 42. Sunset of credits. The application of credits 20awarded pursuant to this Act shall be limited by a reasonable 21and appropriate sunset date. A taxpayer shall not be awarded 22any new credits pursuant to this Act for tax years beginning on 23or after January 1, 2039 January 1, 2033. 24(Source: P.A. 101-178, eff. 8-1-19; 102-700, eff. 4-19-22; 25102-1125, eff. 2-3-23.)   HB2870- 22 -LRB104 12118 HLH 22217 b1    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 2becoming law.